Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1533
Family support program; implementation; conditions.

If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies the 1915(c) waiver required to be submitted in section 68-1530, the family support program outlined in sections 68-1530 to 68-1532 shall not be implemented until such waiver or other mechanism authorizing the program is approved. The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a new waiver application or seek other mechanisms for approval if such application is denied.

Laws 2022, LB376, § 5.